Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska29-3522
Criminal justice agency records; application to inspect; unavailable; procedure to provide records.

If the requested criminal justice history record or other public record, as defined in section 29-3521, of a criminal justice agency is not in the custody or control of the person to whom application is made, such person shall immediately notify the applicant of this fact. Such notification shall be in writing if requested by the applicant and shall state the agency, if known, which has custody or control of the record in question. If the requested criminal history record or other public record of a criminal justice agency is in the custody and control of the person to whom application is made but is not available at the time an applicant asks to examine it, the custodian shall immediately notify the applicant of such fact, in writing, if requested by the applicant. When requested by the applicant, the custodian shall set a date and hour within three working days at which time the record shall be available for inspection.

Laws 1978, LB 713, § 24.